Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 6
AUTHORIZATION AND USE OF VOTING MACHINES
AND ELECTRONIC VOTING SYSTEMS

1-5-601. Use of voting systems - definition.

In all elections held in this state, the votes may be cast, registered, recorded, and counted by means of an electronic or electromechanical voting system as provided in this part 6.

As used in this part 6, "electromechanical voting system" shall include a paper-based voting system as defined in section 1-1-104 (23.5).

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 718, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1345, § 9, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1189, § 2, effective May 15.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-601 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-601.5. Compliance with federal requirements.

All voting systems and voting equipment offered for sale on or after May 28, 2004, must meet the voting systems standards that were promulgated in 2002 by the federal election commission. At his or her discretion, the secretary of state may require by rule that voting systems and voting equipment satisfy voting systems standards promulgated after January 1, 2008, by the federal election assistance commission as long as such standards meet or exceed those promulgated in 2002 by the federal election commission. Subject to section 1-5-608.2, nothing in this section shall be construed to require any political subdivision to replace a voting system that is in use prior to May 28, 2004.

A voting system or voting equipment offered for sale or lease for use in an election using instant runoff voting must meet the minimum standards and specifications developed by the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-5-616 (1.5). If standards related to instant runoff voting are promulgated by the federal election commission, the secretary of state may, at the secretary of state's discretion, require by rule that a voting system or voting equipment used to conduct an election using instant runoff voting meet the federal standards, so long as the federal standards meet or exceed those promulgated by the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1346, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1190, § 3, effective May 15.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2415, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-602. Requirements for voting machines - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 718, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1)(f) and (1)(k) amended, p. 1414, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(e) amended, p. 862, § 119, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) added by revision, pp. 1361, 1213, §§ 30, 31, 108.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, pp. 1361, 1213.)

1-5-603. Adoption and payment for voting machines.

The governing body of any political subdivision may adopt for use at elections any kind of voting machine fulfilling the requirements for voting machines set forth in this part 6. These voting machines may be used at any or all elections held in the political subdivision for casting, registering, and counting votes. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the governing body of any political subdivision which adopts and purchases or leases voting machines shall provide for the payment of the purchase price or the rent in such manner as may be in the best interest of the political subdivision and may for that purpose provide for the issuance of interest-bearing bonds, certificates of indebtedness, or other obligations, which shall be a charge upon the county. The bonds, certificates of indebtedness, or other obligations may be made payable at such times, not exceeding ten years from the date of issue, as may be determined by the governing body but shall not be issued or sold at less than par.

If the secretary of state certifies a voting system for use in an election using instant runoff voting in accordance with section 1-5-617 (1.5), the secretary of state shall, if possible, negotiate a single annual statewide license with the voting system provider to allow each county that uses the voting system to conduct elections using instant runoff voting. The secretary of state shall pay for the annual statewide license from the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b).

Each county that uses a voting system in an instant runoff voting election pursuant to a license obtained by the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (2)(a) of this section shall reimburse the secretary of state for its proportionate share of the cost of the annual statewide license for that year. The secretary of state shall invoice any county that uses the voting system in an instant runoff voting election for its share of the cost as a proportion of the number of registered active voters in all participating municipalities in that county compared to the total number of registered active voters in all participating municipalities in the state as determined by the secretary of state pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 719, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 2017, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2417, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2279, § 8, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-603 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-5-604. Experimental use - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 720, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

(2) added by revision, p. 1361, 1213, §§ 30, 31, 108.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, pp. 1361, 1213.)

1-5-605. Other laws apply - paper ballots permitted for absentee voting - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 720, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

(2) added by revision, pp. 1361, 1213, §§ 30, 31, 108.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, pp. 1361, 1213.)

1-5-605.5. Custody of voting system.

The county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall be the custodian of the voting system in a political subdivision and may appoint deputies necessary to prepare and supervise the voting system prior to and during elections.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1346, § 14, effective May 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-605.7. Mechanical lever voting machines - prohibited.

No voting system using mechanical lever voting machines may be used in any election in this state.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1345, § 12, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(2) repealed, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 833, § 12, effective May 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-606. Election officials and employees not to have interest in voting equipment or devices.

No election official or employee of an election official having duties or responsibilities in connection with the conduct of any election shall have any financial or proprietary interest, either directly or indirectly, in the manufacture, sale, maintenance, servicing, repair, or transportation of voting equipment. This section shall not apply to any designated election official or employee of a designated election official participating in a coordinated election who has no independent decision-making responsibility concerning the selection of voting equipment by the county clerk and recorder or whose interest derives solely from ownership of shares in a mutual or pension fund.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 720, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1744, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1345, § 10, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-606 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-607. Elected officials not to handle voting equipment or devices.

In any political subdivision having a population of one hundred thousand or more, it is unlawful for any elected official or candidate for elective office to prepare, maintain, or repair any voting equipment or device that is to be used or is used in any election. The provisions of this section shall not be construed as prohibiting an elected official from directing employees or other persons who are not elected officials to prepare, maintain, repair, or otherwise handle any voting equipment or devices as required for an election or an election-related purpose.

(1.5) In any political subdivision having a population of one hundred thousand or more, it is unlawful for any elected official, any candidate for elective office, or the secretary of state to have key card access to a room with components of a voting system, or to be present in a room with components of a voting system without being accompanied by one or more individuals with authorized access. This subsection (1.5) does not apply when voting system components are deployed for use or stored at a voting service and polling center.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit any elected official or candidate for elective office from voting at any election.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to precinct committeepersons who act as election judges.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 720, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 96:

(4) repealed, p. 1775, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1345, § 11, effective May 28.

L. 2022:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2280, § 9, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-607 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For penalties for election offenses, see § 1-13-111.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-5-608. Requirements - electronic voting systems - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 721, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1162, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(c) amended, p. 862, § 120, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3) added by revision, pp. 1361, 1213, §§ 30, 31, 108.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, pp. 1361, 1213.)

1-5-608.2. Punch card voting systems - prohibited.

No punch card electronic voting system or other voting system in which the elector uses a device to pierce the ballot may be used in any election in this state.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1345, § 12, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(2) repealed, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 833, § 13, effective May 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-608.5. Electronic and electromechanical voting systems - testing by federally accredited labs - certification and approval of purchasing of electronic and electromechanical voting systems by secretary of state - conditions of use by secretary of state - testing.

A federally accredited laboratory may test, approve, and qualify electronic and electromechanical voting systems for sale and use in the state of Colorado.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1190, § 4, effective May 15, 2009.)

If the electronic and electromechanical voting systems tested pursuant to this section satisfy the requirements of this part 6, the secretary of state shall certify such systems and approve the purchase, installation, and use of such systems by political subdivisions and establish standards for certification.

The secretary of state may promulgate conditions of use in connection with the use by political subdivisions of electronic and electromechanical voting systems as may be appropriate to mitigate deficiencies identified in the certification process.

In undertaking the certification required by this section, the secretary of state may consider either procedures used or adopted by county clerk and recorders or best practices recommended by equipment vendors.

(3.5) (a) On and after December 31, 2022, if an electronic and electromechanical voting system tested pursuant to this section satisfies the requirements of this part 6 related to the use of the system in an election using instant runoff voting and the rules established by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-5-616 (1.5), the secretary of state shall certify such system and approve the purchase, installation, and use of such system by political subdivisions in an election using instant runoff voting.

The secretary of state may promulgate conditions of use in connection with the use by political subdivisions of an electronic and electromechanical voting system in an election using instant runoff voting as may be appropriate to mitigate deficiencies identified in the certification process.

In undertaking the certification required by this section, the secretary of state may consider procedures used or adopted by county clerk and recorders or best practices recommended by equipment vendors.

In undertaking the certification required by this section, the secretary of state may request a federally accredited laboratory to undertake the testing of an electronic or electromechanical voting system or may use and rely upon the testing of an electronic or electromechanical voting system already performed by another state or a federally accredited laboratory upon satisfaction of the following conditions:

The secretary of state has complete access to any documentation, data, reports, or similar information on which the other state or laboratory relied in performing its testing and will make such information available to the public subject to any redaction required by law; and

The secretary of state makes written findings and certifies that he or she reviewed the information specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) and determines that the testing:

Was conducted in accordance with appropriate engineering standards in use as of the time the testing is undertaken; and

Satisfies the requirements of sections 1-5-615 and 1-5-616 and all rules promulgated thereunder.

In undertaking the certification required by this section, the secretary of state may conduct joint testing with an agency of another state or with a federally accredited laboratory.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1414, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1346, § 13, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1190, § 4, effective May 15.

L. 2021:

(3.5) added, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2416, § 3, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-609. Acquisition and use authorized - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 721, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

(3) added by revision, pp. 1361, 1213, §§ 30, 31, 108.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, pp. 1361, 1213.)

1-5-610. Preparation for use - electronic voting.

Prior to an election in which an electronic voting system is to be used, the designated election official shall have all system components prepared for voting and shall inspect and determine that each vote recorder or voting device is in proper working order. The designated election official shall cause a sufficient number of recorders or devices to be delivered to each election precinct in which an electronic voting system is to be used.

The designated election official shall supply each election precinct in which vote recorders or voting devices are to be used with a sufficient number of ballots, ballot cards, sample ballots, ballot boxes, and write-in ballots and with such other supplies and forms as may be required. Each ballot or ballot card shall have a serially numbered stub attached, which shall be removed by an election judge before the ballot or ballot card is deposited in the ballot box.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 722, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-610 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-5-611. Requirements - nonpunch card electronic voting systems.

No nonpunch card electronic voting system shall be purchased, leased, or used unless it fulfills the following requirements:

It provides for voting in secrecy;

It permits each elector to write in the names of eligible candidates not appearing on the printed ballot, to vote for as many candidates for an office as there are vacancies for which the elector is entitled to vote, and to vote for or against any ballot issue upon which the elector is entitled to vote;

It rejects any vote for an office or on a ballot issue if the number of votes exceeds the number the elector is entitled to cast; except that, if the voting system is certified for use in an election using instant runoff voting, the voting system must allow the elector to rank multiple candidates in such an election in accordance with section 1-7-1003 and rules adopted by the secretary of state;

It permits each elector, other than at a primary election, to vote for the candidates of one or more parties and for unaffiliated candidates;

It prevents the elector from voting for the same candidates more than once for the same office; and

If the system uses a voting device:

It is suitably designed, of durable construction, and capable of being used safely, efficiently, and accurately in the conduct of elections and the tabulation of votes;

It permits the names of candidates and the text of issues to be printed on pages which are securely attached to the voting device, the pages to be securely locked in a metal frame or sealed to prevent tampering;

It contains a protective counter with a register which cannot be reset, which shall register the cumulative total number of movements of the operating mechanism; and

It is capable of providing printouts of vote totals by office and candidate or by ballot issue, including a numeric-only printout to be used for testing as provided in section 1-7-509.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 722, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

(1)(d) amended, p. 862, § 121, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(f)(IV) amended, p. 1425, § 55, effective June 6; (1)(f)(IV) amended, p. 1460, § 55, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2416, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-611 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-5-612. Use of electronic and electromechanical voting systems.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the governing body of any political subdivision may, upon consultation with the designated election official, adopt an electronic or electromechanical voting system, including any upgrade in hardware, firmware, or software, for use at the polling locations in the political subdivision. The system may be used for recording, counting, and tabulating votes at all elections held by the political subdivision.

For all elections conducted under the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", the governing body of any political subdivision shall, upon consultation with the designated election official, adopt an electronic or electromechanical voting system to be used for tabulating votes at all elections held by the political subdivision. The provisions of this subsection (1)(b) do not apply to counties with fewer than one thousand active electors as of the date of the last general election.

An electronic or electromechanical voting system may be used only if the system has been certified by the secretary of state in accordance with this part 6.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1347, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 713, § 48, effective May 10.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2280, § 10, effective June 2.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-5-613. Purchase and sale of voting equipment.

The secretary of state shall adopt uniform rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., for the purchase and sale of voting equipment in the state.

The governing body or designated election official of a political subdivision may purchase a voting system only if the voting system has been certified for use in this state by the secretary of state in accordance with this part 6.

The governing body or designated election official of a political subdivision shall notify the secretary of state before purchasing or selling voting equipment. The secretary of state shall attempt to coordinate the sale of excess or outmoded equipment by one political subdivision with purchases of necessary equipment by other political subdivisions.

The secretary of state shall provide information at the request of the governing bodies of the various political subdivisions of the state on the availability and sources of new and used voting equipment.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1347, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 580, § 43, effective May 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-614. Certification of electronic and electromechanical voting systems - standards. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1347, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1191, § 5, effective May 15.

1-5-615. Electronic and electromechanical voting systems - requirements.

The secretary of state shall not certify any electronic or electromechanical voting system unless such system:

Provides for voting in secrecy;

Permits each elector to vote for all offices for which the elector is lawfully entitled to vote and no others, to vote for as many candidates for an office as the elector is entitled to vote for, and to vote for or against any ballot question or ballot issue on which the elector is entitled to vote;

Permits each elector to verify his or her votes privately and independently before the ballot is cast;

Permits each elector privately and independently to change the ballot or correct any error before the ballot is cast, including by voting a replacement ballot if the elector is otherwise unable to change the ballot or correct an error;

If the elector overvotes:

Notifies the elector before the ballot is cast that the elector has overvoted;

Notifies the elector before the vote is cast that an overvote for any office, ballot question, or ballot issue will not be counted; and

Gives the elector the opportunity to correct the ballot before the ballot is cast;

Does not record a vote for any office, ballot question, or ballot issue that is overvoted on a ballot cast by an elector;

For electronic and electromechanical voting systems using ballot cards, accepts an overvoted or undervoted ballot if the elector chooses to cast the ballot, but it does not record a vote for any office, ballot question, or ballot issue that has been overvoted;

In a primary election, permits each elector to vote only for a candidate seeking nomination by the political party with which the elector is affiliated;

In a presidential election, permits each elector to vote by a single operation for all presidential electors of a pair of candidates for president and vice president;

Does not use a device for the piercing of ballots by the elector;

Provides a method for write-in voting;

Counts votes correctly;

Can tabulate the total number of votes for each candidate for each office and the total number of votes for and against each ballot question and ballot issue for the polling location;

Can tabulate votes from ballots of different political parties at the same voter service and polling center in a primary election;

Can automatically produce vote totals for the polling location in printed form; and

Saves and produces the records necessary to audit the operation of the electronic or electromechanical voting system, including a permanent paper record with a manual audit capacity.

(1.5) The secretary of state shall not certify any electronic or electromechanical voting system for use in an election using instant runoff voting unless, in addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the system meets the requirements and performs the functions required by section 1-7-1003.

The permanent paper record produced by the electronic or electromechanical voting system shall be available as an official record for any recount conducted for any election in which the system was used.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1347, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

IP(1), (1)(m), (1)(n), and (1)(o) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 713, § 49, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(1.5) added, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2417, § 6, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) In 2013, the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsections (1)(m), (1)(n), and (1)(o) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-616. Electronic and electromechanical voting systems - standards - procedures.

The secretary of state shall adopt rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., that establish minimum standards for electronic and electromechanical voting systems regarding:

Functional requirements;

Performance levels;

Physical and design characteristics;

Documentation requirements;

Evaluation criteria;

Audit capacity;

Security requirements;

Telecommunications requirements; and

Accessibility.

(1.5) On or before December 31, 2022, the rules adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must include the minimum system requirements and specifications for electronic and electromechanical voting systems used to conduct elections using instant runoff voting.

The secretary of state may review the rules adopted pursuant to subsections (1) and (1.5) of this section governing standards for certification of electronic or electromechanical voting systems to determine the adequacy and effectiveness of the rules in assuring that elections achieve the standards established by section 1-1-103.

The secretary of state shall adopt rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to achieve the standards established by section 1-1-103 for the procedures of voting, including write-in voting, and of counting, tabulating, and recording votes by electronic or electromechanical voting systems used in this state.

The secretary of state shall adapt the standards for certification of electronic or electromechanical voting systems established by rule pursuant to subsections (1) and (1.5) of this section to ensure that new technologies that meet the requirements for such systems are certified in a timely manner and available for selection by political subdivisions and meet user standards.

Each designated election official shall establish written procedures to ensure the accuracy and security of voting in the political subdivision and submit the procedures to the secretary of state for review. The secretary of state shall notify the designated election official of the approval or disapproval of the procedures no later than fifteen days after the secretary of state receives the submission.

Each designated election official shall submit any revisions to the accuracy and security procedures to the secretary of state no less than sixty days before the first election in which the procedures will be used. The secretary of state shall notify the designated election official of the approval or disapproval of said revisions no later than fifteen days after the secretary of state receives the submission.

A county may not create, permit any person to create, or disclose to any person an image of the hard drive of any voting system component without the express written permission of the department of state.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1349, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2006:

(5)(a) amended, p. 2032, § 11, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(1.5) added and (2) and (4) amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2417, § 7, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(6) added, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2280, § 11, effective June 2.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-5-617. Examination - testing - certification.

After an electronic or electromechanical voting system is tested in accordance with section 1-5-608.5, the voting system provider may submit the system to the secretary of state for certification.

The secretary of state shall examine each electronic or electromechanical voting system submitted for certification and determine whether the system complies with the requirements of section 1-5-615 and the standards established under section 1-5-616.

The secretary of state shall decide whether to certify an electronic or electromechanical voting system within one hundred twenty days after the system is submitted for certification.

(1.5) (a) On and after December 31, 2022, after an electronic or electromechanical voting system is tested in accordance with section 1-5-608.5 (3.5) for use in an election using instant runoff voting, the voting system provider may submit the system to the secretary of state for certification for use in an election using instant runoff voting.

The secretary of state shall examine each electronic or electromechanical voting system submitted for certification and determine whether the system complies with the requirements of section 1-5-615 and the standards established under section 1-5-616 for use in an election using instant runoff voting.

The secretary of state shall decide whether to certify an electronic or electromechanical voting system for use in an election using instant runoff voting within one hundred twenty days after the system is submitted for certification.

The secretary of state shall appoint one or more experts in the fields of data processing, mechanical engineering, or public administration to assist in the examination and testing of electronic or electromechanical voting systems submitted for certification and to produce a written report on each system.

Neither the secretary of state nor any examiner shall have any pecuniary interest in any voting equipment.

Within thirty days after deciding to certify an electronic or electromechanical voting system, the secretary of state shall make a report on the system containing a description of the system and its operation, with drawings or photographs showing the system. The secretary of state shall send a notice of certification and a copy of the report to the voting system provider that submitted the system for certification. The secretary of state shall notify the governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state of the certification and make the notice of certification and report available to them upon request.

The designated election official of a political subdivision that plans to use an electronic or electromechanical voting system that has been certified in accordance with this section shall apply to the secretary of state for approval of the purchase, installation, and use of the system. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form and procedure of the application by rule adopted in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The secretary of state may provide technical assistance to designated election officials on issues related to the certification of the purchase, installation, and use of electronic and electromechanical voting systems by a political subdivision.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1350, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2005:

(5) amended, p. 759, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1191, § 6, effective May 15.

L. 2021:

(1.5) added, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2418, § 8, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-618. Modification of electronic and electromechanical voting systems - definition.

After an electronic or electromechanical voting system has been certified by the secretary of state, a political subdivision may not adopt any modification of the system until the modification is certified or approved in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1.5) of this section by the secretary of state. A person desiring approval of a modification shall submit a written application for approval to the secretary of state.

(1.5) Upon receipt of the written application for approval in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the secretary of state shall undertake a preliminary examination of the proposed modification. In connection with such preliminary review, the secretary shall determine if the proposed modification may cause adverse effects on the security or accuracy of elections. The secretary shall make the determination within forty-five days after receiving the request. If the secretary, upon completion of his or her preliminary review of the request, determines that the proposed modification will cause significant adverse effects, the modification shall be subject to further review under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. If the secretary determines, upon completion of his or her preliminary review, that the proposed modification causes no adverse effects, the secretary shall approve the modification. If the secretary determines, upon completion of his or her preliminary review, that the proposed modification causes possible adverse effects, the modification shall be subject to further review under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. Following such additional review, if the secretary determines that any adverse effects of the proposed modification are insignificant, the secretary shall approve the modification. If, however, following such additional review, the secretary determines that the adverse effects of the modification are significant, the modification shall be subject to further review under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

The requirements for approval of a modified electronic or electromechanical voting system are the same as those prescribed by this part 6 for the initial certification of the system.

The secretary of state shall approve the modified electronic or electromechanical voting system by written order if the modified system satisfies the applicable requirements for certification.

If the secretary of state does not approve the modified design, the secretary of state shall by written order:

Invite the applicant to submit additional information in support of the application, submit the modified electronic or electromechanical voting system itself, or both; or

Require an examination of the modified electronic or electromechanical voting system by independent examiners.

After examining the additional information, the modified electronic or electromechanical voting system, or the report of an independent examiner submitted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the secretary of state shall approve the modified system by written order if the system satisfies the applicable requirements for certification.

If a modification to a certified electronic or electromechanical voting system does not satisfy the applicable requirements for certification, the secretary of state shall suspend the sale of the system in this state until the system satisfies the requirements for certification.

For purposes of this section, "modification" means a revision or a new release of an electronic or electromechanical voting system.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1351, § 14, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1192, § 7, effective May 15.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.